Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-642
Granting of permit; conditions; priority date.

(1) If the Chief Water Officer finds that the withdrawal and transportation of ground water requested by the applicant are reasonable, are not contrary to the conservation and beneficial use of ground water, and are not otherwise detrimental to the public welfare, he or she shall grant a permit to the applicant to withdraw and transport water in the amount applied for or in a lesser amount. The permit so granted shall have a priority date as of the time when the application is filed with the Chief Water Officer.

(2) In determining whether to grant or deny a permit under subsection (1) of this section, the Chief Water Officer shall consider the factors set forth in subdivisions (1) through (7) of section 46-613.01.

Laws 1963, c. 276, § 5, p. 830;

Laws 1967, c. 284, § 1, p. 772;

Laws 1987, LB 140, § 14;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 181;

Laws 2003, LB 619, § 8;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 182.